Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-502.02
Policy loans; published monthly average, defined.

For purposes of sections 44-502.01 to 44-502.04, published monthly average shall mean a monthly bond yield average which is:

(1) Published by a national financial statistical organization;

(2) Recognized by the National Association of Insurance Commissioners;

(3) In current general use in the insurance industry; and

(4) Designated by the Director of Insurance.

Laws 1981, LB 355, § 15.